California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(3) All information provided to the Department of Justice pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be kept confidential, separate, and apart from all other records maintained by the Department of Justice, and shall be used only to determine eligibility to purchase or possess a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition. A person who knowingly furnishes
 that information for any other purpose is guilty of a misdemeanor. All the information concerning a person shall be destroyed upon receipt by the Department of Justice of notice of the termination of conservatorship as to that person pursuant to paragraph (2).

(f) (1) (A) A person who has been (i) taken into custody as provided in Section 5150 because that person is a danger to themselves or to others, (ii) assessed within the meaning of Section 5151, and (iii) admitted to a designated facility within the meaning of Sections 5151 and 5152 because that person is a danger to themselves or others shall not own, possess, control, receive, or purchase, or attempt to own, possess, control, receive, or purchase, a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition for a period of five years after the person is released from the facility.

(B) A person
 who has been taken into custody, assessed, and admitted as specified in subparagraph (A), and who was previously taken into custody, assessed, and admitted as specified in subparagraph (A) one or more times within a period of one year preceding the most recent admittance, shall not own, possess, control, receive, or purchase, or attempt to own, possess, control, receive, or purchase, any firearm for the remainder of their life.

(C) A person described in this paragraph, however, may own, possess, control, receive, or purchase, or attempt to own, possess, control, receive, or purchase a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition if the superior court has, pursuant to paragraph (5), found that the people of the State of California have not met their burden pursuant to paragraph (6).

(2) (A) (i) For each person subject to this subdivision,
 the facility shall, within 24 hours of the time of admission, submit a report to the Department of Justice, on a form prescribed by the Department of Justice, containing information that includes, but is not limited to, the identity of the person and the legal grounds upon which the person was admitted to the facility.

(ii) A report submitted pursuant to this paragraph shall be confidential, except for purposes of the court proceedings described in this subdivision and for determining the eligibility of the person to own, possess, control, receive, or purchase a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition.

(B) Facilities shall submit reports pursuant to this paragraph exclusively by electronic means, in a manner prescribed by the Department of Justice.

(3) Prior to, or concurrent with, the discharge, the facility
 shall inform a person subject to this subdivision that they are prohibited from owning, possessing, controlling, receiving, or purchasing a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition for a period of five years or, if the person was previously taken into custody, assessed, and admitted to custody for a 72-hour hold because they were a danger to themselves or to others during the previous one-year period, for life. The facility shall inform the person that they are required to relinquish a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition that the person owns, possesses, or controls within 72 hours of discharge from the facility and how to relinquish a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition according to state law and local procedures. Simultaneously, the facility shall inform the person that they may request a hearing from a court, as provided in this subdivision, for an order permitting the person to own, possess, control, receive, or purchase a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition. The facility shall
 also provide the person with a copy of the most recent “Patient Notification of Firearm Prohibition and Right to Hearing Form” prescribed by the Department of Justice and a copy of the completed form to the Department of Justice in a manner prescribed by the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice shall update this form in accordance with the requirements of this section and distribute the updated form to facilities by January 1, 2020. The form shall include information regarding how the person was referred to the facility. The form shall include an authorization for the release of the person’s mental health records, upon request, to the appropriate court, solely for use in the hearing conducted pursuant to paragraph (5). A request for the records may be made by mail to the custodian of records at the facility, and shall not require personal service. The facility shall not submit the form on behalf of the person subject to this subdivision.

(4) The Department of Justice shall provide the form upon request to a person described in paragraph (1). The Department of Justice shall also provide the form to the superior court in each county. The Department of Justice shall also provide a copy of the form upon the request of a law enforcement agency solely for investigative purposes. A person described in paragraph (1) may make a single request for a hearing at any time during the five-year period or period of the lifetime prohibition. The request for hearing shall be made on the form prescribed by the department or in a document that includes equivalent language.

(5) A person who is subject to paragraph (1) who has requested a hearing from the superior court of the county of their residence for an order that they may own, possess, control, receive, or purchase a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition shall be given a hearing. The clerk of the court shall set a hearing
 date and notify the person, the Department of Justice, and the district attorney. The people of the State of California shall be the plaintiff in the proceeding and shall be represented by the district attorney. Upon motion of the district attorney, or on its own motion, the superior court may transfer the hearing to the county in which the person resided at the time of their detention, the county in which the person was detained, or the county in which the person was evaluated or treated. Within seven days after the request for a hearing, the Department of Justice shall file copies of the reports described in this section with the superior court. The reports shall be disclosed upon request to the person and to the district attorney. The court shall set the hearing within 60 days of receipt of the request for a hearing. Upon showing good cause, the district attorney shall be entitled to a continuance not to exceed 30 days after the district attorney was notified of the hearing date by the clerk of the court.
 If additional continuances are granted, the total length of time for continuances shall not exceed 60 days. The district attorney may notify the county behavioral health director of the hearing who shall provide information about the detention of the person that may be relevant to the court and shall file that information with the superior court. That information shall be disclosed to the person and to the district attorney. The court, upon motion of the person subject to paragraph (1) establishing that confidential information is likely to be discussed during the hearing that would cause harm to the person, shall conduct the hearing in camera with only the relevant parties present, unless the court finds that the public interest would be better served by conducting the hearing in public. Notwithstanding any other law, declarations, police reports, including criminal history information, and any other material and relevant evidence that is not excluded under Section 352 of the Evidence Code shall be
 admissible at the hearing under this section.

(6) The people shall bear the burden of showing by a preponderance of the evidence that the person would not be likely to use a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition in a safe and lawful manner.

(7) If the court finds at the hearing set forth in paragraph (5) that the people have not met their burden as set forth in paragraph (6), the court shall order that the person shall not be subject to the five-year prohibition or lifetime prohibition, as appropriate, in this section on the ownership, control, receipt, possession, or purchase of a firearm, and that person shall comply with the procedure described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code for the return of a firearm. A copy of the order shall be submitted to the Department of Justice. Upon receipt of the order, the
 Department of Justice shall delete any reference to the prohibition against firearms from the person’s state mental health firearms prohibition system information.

(8) If the district attorney declines or fails to go forward in the hearing, the court shall order that the person shall not be subject to the five-year prohibition or lifetime prohibition required by this subdivision on the ownership, control, receipt, possession, or purchase of firearms. A copy of the order shall be submitted to the Department of Justice. Upon receipt of the order, the Department of Justice shall, within 15 days, delete any reference to the prohibition against firearms from the person’s state mental health firearms prohibition system information, and that person shall comply with the procedure described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code for the return of a firearm.

(9) This subdivision does not prohibit the use of reports filed pursuant to this section to determine the eligibility of persons to own, possess, control, receive, or purchase a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition if the person is the subject of a criminal investigation, a part of which involves the ownership, possession, control, receipt, or purchase of a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition.

(10) If the court finds that the people have met their burden to show by a preponderance of the evidence that the person would not be likely to use a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition in a safe and lawful manner and the person is subject to a lifetime firearm prohibition because the person had been admitted as specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) more than once within the previous one-year period, the court shall inform the person of their right to file a
 subsequent petition no sooner than five years from the date of the hearing.

(11) A person subject to a lifetime firearm prohibition is entitled to bring subsequent petitions pursuant to this subdivision. A person shall not be entitled to file a subsequent petition, and shall not be entitled to a subsequent hearing, until five years have passed since the determination on the person’s last petition. A hearing on subsequent petitions shall be conducted as described in this subdivision, with the exception that the burden of proof shall be on the petitioner to establish by a preponderance of the evidence that the petitioner can use a firearm in a safe and lawful manner. Subsequent petitions shall be filed in the same court of jurisdiction as the initial petition regarding the lifetime firearm prohibition.

(12) (A) A person who is subject to paragraph (1), within
 72 hours of discharge from a facility, shall relinquish a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition that they own, possess, or control in a safe manner by any of the following methods:

(i) Surrender to the control of a law enforcement agency.

(ii) Sell or transfer to a licensed firearms dealer, as specified in Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2 of Division 6 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.

(iii) Transfer or cause to be transferred to a licensed firearms dealer for storage during the duration of the prohibition pursuant to Section 29830 of the Penal Code.

(iv) Sell or transfer to a nonprohibited third party with whom the prohibited person does not live using a licensed firearms
 dealer pursuant to Section 28050 of the Penal Code.

(B) The law enforcement agency or licensed firearms dealer taking possession of a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition from a person relinquishing a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition pursuant to this paragraph shall issue a receipt to the person at the time of relinquishment.

(C) The “Patient Notification of Firearm Prohibition and Right to Hearing Form” described in paragraph (3) shall include information about how a person will relinquish their firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(g) (1) (A) A person who has been certified for intensive treatment under Section 5250, 5260, or 5270.15 shall not own, possess, control, receive, or purchase, or attempt to own, possess,
 control, receive, or purchase, a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition for a period of five years.

(B) A person who meets the criteria contained in subdivision (e) or (f) who is released from intensive treatment shall nevertheless, if applicable, remain subject to the prohibition contained in subdivision (e) or (f).

(2) (A) For each person certified for intensive treatment under paragraph (1), the facility shall, within 24 hours of the certification, submit a report to the Department of Justice, on a form prescribed by the department, containing information regarding the person, including, but not limited to, the legal identity of the person and the legal grounds upon which the person was certified. A report submitted pursuant to this paragraph shall only be used for the purposes specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f).

(B) Facilities shall submit reports pursuant to this paragraph exclusively by electronic means, in a manner prescribed by the Department of Justice.

(3) Prior to, or concurrent with, the discharge of each person certified for intensive treatment under paragraph (1), the facility shall inform the person of that information specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f).

(4) A person who is subject to paragraph (1) may petition the superior court of the county of their residence for an order that they may own, possess, control, receive, or purchase a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition. At the time the petition is filed, the clerk of the court shall set a hearing date within 60 days of receipt of the petition and notify the person, the Department of Justice, and the district attorney. The people of the State of
 California shall be the respondent in the proceeding and shall be represented by the district attorney. Upon motion of the district attorney, or on its own motion, the superior court may transfer the petition to the county in which the person resided at the time of their detention, the county in which the person was detained, or the county in which the person was evaluated or treated. Within seven days after receiving notice of the petition, the Department of Justice shall file copies of the reports described in this section with the superior court. The reports shall be disclosed upon request to the person and to the district attorney. The district attorney shall be entitled to a continuance of the hearing to a date of not less than 30 days after the district attorney was notified of the hearing date by the clerk of the court. If additional continuances are granted, the total length of time for continuances shall not exceed 60 days. The district attorney may notify the county behavioral health director of
 the petition, and the county behavioral health director shall provide information about the detention of the person that may be relevant to the court and shall file that information with the superior court. That information shall be disclosed to the person and to the district attorney. The court, upon motion of the person subject to paragraph (1) establishing that confidential information is likely to be discussed during the hearing that would cause harm to the person, shall conduct the hearing in camera with only the relevant parties present, unless the court finds that the public interest would be better served by conducting the hearing in public. Notwithstanding any other law, a declaration, police report, including criminal history information, and any other material and relevant evidence that is not excluded under Section 352 of the Evidence Code, shall be admissible at the hearing under this section. If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the person would be likely to use a firearm,
 other deadly weapon, or ammunition in a safe and lawful manner, the court may order that the person may own, control, receive, possess, or purchase a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition, and that person shall comply with the procedure described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code for the return of a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition. A copy of the order shall be submitted to the Department of Justice. Upon receipt of the order, the Department of Justice shall delete any reference to the prohibition from the person’s state mental health firearms prohibition system information.

(h) (1) For all persons identified in subdivisions (f) and (g), a facility shall report to the Department of Justice, as specified in those subdivisions, except facilities shall not report a person under subdivision (g) if the same person was previously reported under
 subdivision (f).

(2) Additionally, a facility shall report to the Department of Justice upon the discharge of persons from whom reports have been submitted pursuant to subdivision (f) or (g). However, a report shall not be filed for persons who are discharged within 31 days after the date of admission.

(i) (1) A person, who has been found by a court, on or after July 1, 2024, to be prohibited from owning or controlling a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition because they are a danger to themselves or others and has been granted pretrial mental health diversion pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 1001.36 or subdivision (p) of Section 1001.80 of the Penal Code, shall not own, possess, control, receive, or purchase, or attempt to own, possess, control, receive, or purchase, a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition until the person successfully
 completes diversion or their rights are restored pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (g).

(2) The court shall notify the Department of Justice of the court order finding the person to be an individual described in paragraph (1) as soon as possible, but not later than one court day after issuing the order. The court shall also notify the Department of Justice that the person has successfully completed diversion as soon as possible, but not later than one court day after completion.

(j) Every person who owns or possesses or has custody or control of, or purchases or receives, or attempts to purchase or receive, a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition in violation of this section shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code or in a county jail for not more than one year.

(k) “Deadly weapon,” as used in this section, has the meaning prescribed by Section 8100.

(l) A notice or report required to be submitted to the Department of Justice pursuant to this section shall be submitted in an electronic format, in a manner prescribed by the Department of Justice.

(m) This section shall become operative on September 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2.4) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 924, Sec. 2.5.   (SB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative September 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8104.

The State Department of State Hospitals shall maintain in a convenient central location and shall make available to the Department of Justice those records that the State Department of State Hospitals has in its possession that are necessary to identify persons who come within Section 8100 or 8103. Upon request of the Department of Justice, the State Department of State Hospitals shall make these records available to the
 Department of Justice in electronic format within 24 hours of receiving the request. The Department of Justice shall make these requests only with respect to its duties with regard to applications for permits for, or to carry, or the possession, purchase, or transfer of, explosives as defined in Section 12000 of the Health and Safety Code, devices defined in Section 16250, 16530, or 16640 of the Penal Code, in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 16520 of the Penal Code, or in subdivision (a) of Section 16840 of the Penal Code, machineguns as defined in Section 16880 of the Penal Code, short-barreled shotguns or short-barreled rifles as defined in Sections 17170 and 17180 of the Penal Code, assault weapons as defined in Section 30510 of the Penal Code, and destructive devices as defined in Section 16460 of the Penal Code, or to determine the eligibility of a person to acquire, carry, or possess a firearm, explosive, or destructive device by a person who is subject to a criminal investigation, a
 part of which involves the acquisition, carrying, or possession of a firearm by that person. These records shall not be furnished or made available to any person unless the department determines that disclosure of any information in the records is necessary to carry out its duties with respect to applications for permits for, or to carry, or the possession, purchase, or transfer of, explosives, destructive devices, devices as defined in Section 16250, 16530, or 16640 of the Penal Code, in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 16520 of the Penal Code, or in subdivision (a) of Section 16840 of the Penal Code, short-barreled shotguns, short-barreled rifles, assault weapons, and machineguns, or to determine the eligibility of a person to acquire, carry, or possess a firearm, explosive, or destructive device by a person who is subject to a criminal investigation, a part of which involves the acquisition, carrying, or possession of a firearm by that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 747, Sec. 4.   (AB 1131)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8105.

(a) The Department of Justice shall request each public and private mental hospital, sanitarium, and institution to submit to the department information the department deems necessary to identify those persons who are subject to the prohibition specified by subdivision (a) of Section 8100, in order to carry out its duties in relation to firearms, destructive devices, and explosives.

(b) Upon request of the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (a), each public and private mental hospital, sanitarium, and institution shall submit to the department information the department deems necessary to identify those persons who are subject to the prohibition specified by subdivision (a) of Section 8100, in
 order to carry out its duties in relation to firearms, destructive devices, and explosives.

(c) A licensed psychotherapist shall report to a local law enforcement agency, within 24 hours, in a manner prescribed by the Department of Justice, the identity of a person subject to the prohibition specified by subdivision (b) of Section 8100. Upon receipt of the report, the local law enforcement agency, on a form prescribed by the Department of Justice, shall notify the department electronically, within 24 hours, in a manner prescribed by the department, of the person who is subject to the prohibition specified by subdivision (b) of Section 8100.

(d) All information provided to the Department of Justice pursuant to this section shall be kept confidential, separate, and apart from all other records maintained by the department. The information provided to the Department of Justice
 pursuant to this section shall be used only for any of the following purposes:

(1) By the department to determine eligibility of a person to acquire, carry, or possess firearms, destructive devices, or explosives.

(2) For the purposes of the court proceedings described in subdivision (b) of Section 8100, to determine the eligibility of the person who is bringing the petition pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 8100.

(3) To determine the eligibility of a person to acquire, carry, or possess firearms, destructive devices, or explosives who is the subject of a criminal investigation, or who is the subject of a petition for the issuance of a gun violence restraining order issued pursuant to Division 3.2 (commencing with Section 18100) of Title 2 of Part 6 of the Penal Code, if a part of the
 investigation involves the acquisition, carrying, or possession of firearms, explosives, or destructive devices by that person.

(e) Reports shall not be required or requested under this section if the same person has been previously reported pursuant to Section 8103 or 8104.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 872, Sec. 7.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative January 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8106.

Individual data required to be reported to the Department of Justice pursuant to this chapter related to prohibition of ownership and possession of a firearm and ammunition shall be available to researchers affiliated with the California Firearm Violence Research Center at UC Davis following approval by the institution’s governing institutional review board, when required. At the department’s discretion, and subject to Section 14240 of the Penal Code, the data may be provided to any other nonprofit bona fide research institution accredited by the United States Department of Education or the Council for Higher Education Accreditation for the study of the prevention of violence, following approval by the institution’s governing institutional review board or human subjects committee, when required, for academic and policy research
 purposes. Material identifying individuals shall only be provided for research or statistical activities and shall not be transferred, revealed, or used for purposes other than research or statistical activities, and reports or publications derived therefrom shall not identify specific individuals. Reasonable costs to the department associated with the department’s processing of that data may be billed to the researcher. If a request for data or letter of support for research using the data is denied, the department shall provide a written statement of the specific reasons for the denial.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 253, Sec. 13.   (AB 173)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8108.

Mental hospitals, health facilities, or other institutions, or treating health professionals or psychotherapists who provide reports subject to this chapter shall be civilly immune for making any report required or authorized by this chapter. This section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 951, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.6. Exemption of Golden State Stimulus Payments and Golden State Grant Payments from Garnishment Orders [8152. - 8152.]

8152.

(a) (1) A Golden State Stimulus payment made by the Controller pursuant to Section 8150 or 8150.2, a Golden State Grant payment made by the State Department of Social Services or contracted entities pursuant to Section 8151, and a payment made pursuant to Section 12201.7 shall be automatically exempt from a garnishment order.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to a garnishment order in connection with an action for, or a judgment awarding, child support, spousal support, family support, or a criminal restitution payable to victims.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a financial institution receiving directly from the state the payments described in subdivision (a) shall exempt
 those payments from any garnishment order if the payment is marked by the state as a “Golden State Stimulus payment,” “Golden State Stimulus II payment,” or “Golden State Grant payment” or includes some other industry-standard unique identifier that is reasonably sufficient to allow the financial institution to identify the funds as a Golden State Stimulus payment, Golden State Stimulus II payment, or Golden State Grant payment.

(c) (1) In exempting a Golden State Stimulus payment, a Golden State Stimulus II payment, or Golden State Grant payment from a garnishment order, a financial institution shall identify an exempt deposit using a lookback period during an account review.

(2) The financial institution shall perform a one-time account review consistent with the requirements described in subsection (a) of Section 212.5 of Title 31 of the Code of Federal
 Regulations.

(d) A financial institution that attempts in good faith to comply with this section shall not be subject to liability or regulatory action under a federal or state law, regulation, court or other order, or regulatory interpretation for actions concerning applicable payments.

(e) As used in this section:

(1) “Account review” means the process of examining deposits in an account to determine if a benefit agency has deposited a benefit payment into the account during the lookback period.

(2) “Garnishment order” means a writ, order, notice, summons, judgment, levy, or similar written instruction issued by a court, a state or state agency, or a municipality or municipal corporation, including an order to freeze the assets in an account, to
 effect a garnishment against a debtor.

(3) “Lookback period” means the two-month period that begins on the date preceding the date of account review and ends on the corresponding date of the month two months earlier or on the last date of the month two months earlier if the corresponding date does not exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 71, Sec. 7.   (SB 139)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.9. Better for Families Tax Refund [8160. - 8165.]

8160.

This chapter is known and may be cited as the “Better for Families Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 51, Sec. 6.   (AB 192)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 8165.)
-------------------------------------------

8161.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board shall, as soon as possible, make a one-time payment in the applicable amount to each qualified recipient. A qualified recipient shall not receive more than one payment of the applicable amount. The payments may be made in the form and manner determined by the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Applicable amount” means any of the following:

(A) In the case of spouses filing a joint return pursuant to Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, that reported a California adjusted gross income, on the
 return described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4), of:

(i) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) or less, the applicable amount shall be seven hundred dollars ($700) plus an additional three hundred fifty dollars ($350) if the qualified recipient claimed a credit for one or more dependents under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 17054 of the Revenue and Taxation Code on the return described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4).

(ii) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or less, and more than one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), the applicable amount shall be five hundred dollars ($500) plus an additional two hundred fifty dollars ($250) if the qualified recipient claimed a credit for one or more dependents under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 17054 of the Revenue and Taxation Code on the return
 described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4).

(iii) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or less, and more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the applicable amount shall be four hundred dollars ($400) plus an additional two hundred dollars ($200) if the qualified recipient claimed a credit for one or more dependents under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 17054 of the Revenue and Taxation Code on the return described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4).

(B) In the case of an individual filing a head of household return pursuant to Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or an individual filing a surviving spouse return pursuant to Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code that reported a California adjusted gross income, on
 the return described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4), of:

(i) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) or less, the applicable amount shall be three hundred fifty dollars ($350) plus an additional three hundred fifty dollars ($350) if the qualified recipient claimed a credit for one or more dependents under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 17054 of the Revenue and Taxation Code on the return described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4).

(ii) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or less, and more than one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), the applicable amount shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250) plus an additional two hundred fifty dollars ($250) if the qualified recipient claimed a credit for one or more dependents under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 17054 of the Revenue and Taxation Code on
 the return described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4).

(iii) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or less, and more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the applicable amount shall be two hundred dollars ($200) plus an additional two hundred dollars ($200) if the qualified recipient claimed a credit for one or more dependents under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 17054 of the Revenue and Taxation Code on the return described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4).

(C) In the case of any other individual that reported a California adjusted gross income, on the return described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4), of:

(i) Seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) or less, the applicable amount shall be three hundred fifty dollars ($350) plus an
 additional three hundred fifty dollars ($350) if the qualified recipient claimed a credit for one or more dependents under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 17054 of the Revenue and Taxation Code on the return described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4).

(ii) One hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) or less and more than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), the applicable amount shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250) plus an additional two hundred fifty dollars ($250) if the qualified recipient claimed a credit for one or more dependents under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 17054 of the Revenue and Taxation Code on the return described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4).

(iii) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or less and more than one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000), the
 applicable amount shall be two hundred dollars ($200) plus an additional two hundred dollars ($200) if the qualified recipient claimed a credit for one or more dependents under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 17054 of the Revenue and Taxation Code on the return described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4).

(2) “Individual” shall have the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 17005 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(3) “Resident” shall have the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 17014 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(4) (A) “Qualified recipient” means an individual that satisfies all of the following:

(i) Filed a California individual income tax return on or before October 15,
 2021, for the taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2021.

(ii) Is a resident of the state on the date payment is issued pursuant to subdivision (a).

(iii) Was a resident of the state for six months or more of the taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2021.

(iv) Cannot be claimed as a dependent, as defined in Section 17056 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, by another taxpayer.

(B) In the case of an individual who included either their federal individual taxpayer identification number or, if married, the federal individual taxpayer identification number of their spouse, on their California individual income tax return for the taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and
 before January 1, 2021, and who meets all of the other requirements of a qualified recipient, if the individual or their spouse applied for, but did not receive, a federal individual taxpayer identification number on or before October 15, 2021, the individual is a qualified recipient for purposes of this section if the tax return described in this subparagraph was filed on or before February 15, 2022.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) and (B), “qualified recipient” shall not include an individual that satisfies all of the following:

(i) Is an individual without a dependent, as defined in Section 17056 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(ii) Files or filed their California individual income tax return using the single filing status for the taxable year described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A).

(iii) Is either of the following:

(I) Is deceased on the date the payment would otherwise be issued as authorized under subdivision (a).

(II) Is incarcerated, other than incarceration pending the disposition of charges, in a jail, prison, or similar penal institution or correctional facility on the date the payment would otherwise be issued as authorized under subdivision (a).

(c) In the case of a qualified recipient who files a joint return with their spouse pursuant to Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of the Revenue and Taxation Code for the taxable year described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), the qualified recipient and their spouse shall be considered one qualified recipient for purposes of this
 section, and shall receive only one payment of the applicable amount.

(d) (1) The Franchise Tax Board shall issue the payments authorized by this section no later than September 30, 2023.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the Franchise Tax Board may reissue stale, dated, or replacement warrants for the payments pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 905.2 of the Government Code after September 30, 2023, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the Franchise Tax Board, through a third-party vendor, may reissue replacement debit cards after September 30, 2023, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(e) The payment
 authorized by this section shall not be a refund of an overpayment of income taxes under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 19301) of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code of any liability imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.
